Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Representative Districts
5.271.
Seventy-first Representative District.

The Seventy-first Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Laurel KY (part)

D101 - East Bernstadt #1

E103 - Colony

E107 - Colony #2

County: Madison KY (part)

A101 - Big Hill-Blue Lick

A102 - East Berea

A103 - Gay-Stephens

A104 - North Berea

A105 - South Berea

A106 - West Berea-Mayde

A108 - Silver Creek

A110 - Walker Branch

D104 - Menelaus Todd East

County: Pulaski KY (part)

B111 - Estesburg 26

C105 - Price 27

C106 - Goodhope-Hazeldell 28

C111 - Catron 31

County: Rockcastle KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
71, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
71, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
71, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 109, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 71, effective January 20, 2022.

5.272.
Seventy-second Representative District.

The Seventy-second Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Bourbon KY

County: Fleming KY

County: Nicholas KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
72, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
72, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
72, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 110, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 72, effective January 20, 2022.

5.273.
Seventy-third Representative District.

The Seventy-third Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Clark KY

County: Fayette KY (part)

C151 - Cove Lake

C187 - Chilesburg

C203 - Gingermill

C212 - Brookewind

C225 - Boone Station

C233 - Walnut Creek

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
73, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
73, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
73, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 111, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 73, effective January 20, 2022.

5.274.
Seventy-fourth Representative District.

The Seventy-fourth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Bath KY

County: Menifee KY

County: Montgomery KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
74, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
74, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
74, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 112, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 74, effective January 20, 2022.

5.275.
Seventy-fifth Representative District.

The Seventy-fifth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Fayette KY (part)

A101 - Alexandria

A102 - Barker

A103 - Beaumont

A106 - Cardinal Valley

A113 - Garden Springs

A114 - Gibson Park

A118 - Holiday Hills

A121 - Keys

A123 - Lane Allen

A128 - Meadowthorpe

A131 - Oxford

A132 - Pine Meadows

A136 - Skycrest

A139 - Turfland

A140 - Versailles Rd

A143 - West Main

A145 - Wolf Run

A151 - Clays Mill

A156 - Pershing

A163 - Fairgrounds

A166 - Twin Oaks

A167 - Pasadena

A173 - Imperial

A178 - Caywood

A181 - Headley Green

A184 - Bunker

A185 - Lawrence

B102 - Barkley

B108 - Deerfield

B113 - Goodrich

B114 - Hill-N-Dale

B118 - Lafayette

B130 - Open Gates

B132 - Picadome

B159 - Southview

C105 - Aylesford

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
75, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
75, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
75, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 113, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 75, effective January 20, 2022.

5.276.
Seventy-sixth Representative District.

The Seventy-sixth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Fayette KY (part)

A111 - Fairlawn

A168 - Blue Acres

A169 - Castlewood

A170 - Meadow Lane

A171 - Northern

A172 - Warfield Place

A174 - Arlington

B139 - Clays Spring

B151 - Blairmore

C103 - Ashland Avenue

C109 - Bryan Station

C113 - Chevy Chase

C118 - Deep Springs

C120 - Duke

C121 - Eastland

C124 - Fontaine

C126 - Kingswood

C127 - Hermitage

C129 - Idle Hour

C130 - Julia R Ewan

C132 - Johnson Heights

C137 - Rookwood

C138 - Victory

C140 - Walton

C142 - Woodland

C143 - Woodspoint

C144 - Alsab

C148 - Delaware

C153 - Kingston

C155 - Mary Todd

C159 - Shandon Park

C170 - Breckinridge

C195 - Liberty Station

C205 - Crystal Falls

C207 - North Pointe

C211 - Biloxi

C213 - Chatsworth

C219 - Market Garden

C221 - Ridgebrook

C222 - Rosewood

C226 - Burkewood

C230 - Red Leaf

C231 - Rockminster

C238 - Villa

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
76, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
76, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
76, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 114, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 76, effective January 20, 2022.

5.277.
Seventy-seventh Representative District.

The Seventy-seventh Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Fayette KY (part)

A109 - Douglas-Washington

A115 - Green Acres

A116 - Trailside

A117 - Hampton Court

A120 - Julius Marks

A126 - Marlboro

A130 - Oakwood

A133 - Preston Inn

A134 - Radcliffe

A135 - St. Martins

A144 - Winburn

A146 - Triangle Park

A148 - Alabama

A149 - Aspendale-Bluegrass

A150 - Campsie

A152 - Highlands

A155 - Ohio-Walnut

A161 - Coolavin

A164 - Hollow Creek

A165 - Griffin Gate

A177 - Phoenix Park

A179 - Valley Farm

A183 - Silver Creek

A190 - Greenway

A191 - Kenova Trace

A194 - Majestic View

A195 - Coventry

A196 - Stallion Run

A197 - Valley Brook

A198 - Whiteberry

A199 - Ferndale

A200 - Red Clover

A201 - Winding Oak

A204 - Locust Blossom

A205 - Fieldrush

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
77, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
77, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
77, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 115, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 77, effective January 20, 2022.

5.278.
Seventy-eighth Representative District.

The Seventy-eighth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Boone KY (part)

B127 - Walton #1

B128 - Walton #2

B134 - Kensington

County: Campbell KY (part)

B807 - Alexandria G

B904 - Grants Lick

B905 - Claryville

County: Kenton KY (part)

B119 - Morningview

B120 - Nicholson #1

B121 - Nicholson #2

B123 - Piner

B129 - Visalia

B130 - Whites Tower

B137 - Independence #10

B141 - Nicholson #3

County: Pendleton KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
78, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
78, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
78, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 116, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 78, effective January 20, 2022.

5.279.
Seventy-ninth Representative District.

The Seventy-ninth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Fayette KY (part)

B105 - Brookhaven

B112 - Glendover

B119 - Laketower

B120 - Lansdowne

B121 - Leawood

B123 - Ecton Park

B125 - Malabu

B128 - Chinoe

B133 - Cedar Run

B135 - Seven Parks

B137 - Shadeland

B138 - Shady Lane

B147 - Zandale

B152 - Edgewater

B157 - Kirklevington

B158 - Park Hills

B165 - Oaks

B166 - Lakeview

B167 - Gray Hawk

B168 - Montavesta

B169 - Mt. Rainier

B182 - Montclair

B188 - Castlegate

B189 - Kittiwake

B190 - Laredo

B197 - Aqueduct

B211 - Rhodora Ridge

B229 - Complex

C115 - Clifton

C128 - Hollywood

C150 - Winter Garden

C156 - Patchen Village

C157 - Richmond Rd.

C165 - Crestview

C167 - Rio Dosa

C171 - Groves Point

C189 - Saddlebrook

C191 - Plainview

C196 - Mapleleaf

C198 - Mt. Rushmore

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
79, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
79, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
79, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 117, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 79, effective January 20, 2022.

5.280.
Eightieth Representative District.

The Eightieth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Garrard KY

County: Lincoln KY

County: Pulaski KY (part)

B110 - Eubank 25

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
80, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
80, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
80, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 118, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 80, effective January 20, 2022.

5.281.
Eighty-first Representative District.

The Eighty-first Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Madison KY (part)

A107 - Clay

B102 - North Chenault

B103 - South Chenault

B104 - Newby Jones-Valley View

B105 - West Richmond-College-Bre

B106 - Greenway

B107 - Killarney

B108 - North Whitehall-Daniel Bo

B109 - South Whitehall-Daniel Bo

B110 - Forest Hill

B111 - Clays Ferry

C101 - Lost Fork

C102 - Redhouse

D101 - Tevis Cottonburg Poosey

D102 - Burnam Highpoint

D103 - Menelaus Todd West

D105 - South Richmond

D106 - Kingston

D107 - Army Depot

D108 - Battlefield

D110 - Eastern Campus

D111 - Deacon Hills

D112 - South Crutcher

D113 - North Crutcher

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
81. effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
81, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
81, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 119, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 81, effective January 20, 2022.

5.282.
Eighty-second Representative District.

The Eighty-second Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Laurel KY (part)

F101 - Campbell

F104 - Level Green

F105 - Keavy

County: Whitley KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
82, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
82, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
82, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 120, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 82, effective January 20, 2022.

5.283.
Eighty-third Representative District.

The Eighty-third Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Clinton KY

County: Pulaski KY (part)

A101 - West Somerset 5b

A102 - Saline 11

A103 - Nancy 15

A104 - Harrison 17

A108 - Oak Hill 11

A110 - Okalona 16

A111 - Naomi East 44

A112 - Naomi West 44

B101 - Girdler 12

B102 - Hickory Nut 19

B103 - Ansel 21

B109 - Mt Zion 47

B112 - Fall Branch 18

E105 - Bourbon West 10 W

E110 - Som 5d Neighborhood

County: Russell KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
83, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
83, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
83, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 121, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 83, effective January 20, 2022.

5.284.
Eighty-fourth Representative District.

The Eighty-fourth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Breathitt KY

County: Owsley KY

County: Perry KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
84, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
84, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
84, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 122, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 84, effective January 20, 2022.

5.285.
Eighty-fifth Representative District.

The Eighty-fifth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Laurel KY (part)

A106 - Sublimity #2

C109 - London #6

D107 - London #7

D108 - Liberty

E101 - London #5

E104 - London #4

E105 - Hart

E106 - Hart #2

E108 - Liberty #2

F102 - Cold Hill

F103 - Independence

F106 - Rockhouse

County: Pulaski KY (part)

A105 - Som 3b Courthouse

B104 - Science Hill City 22

B105 - Science Hill Co 23

B106 - Buncombe 24

B107 - Som 1 Courthouse

B108 - Som 3a Huffaker

B113 - Norwood 42

C101 - Som 2 City Hall

C102 - Caney Fork 13

C103 - Som 4a Rocky Hollow

C104 - Som 4b Meece Middle

C110 - Vaught 43

C112 - Dallas 45

C113 - Som 3c Saddlebrook

D101 - Som 5a Memorial

D102 - Rush Branch 14

D103 - Parker 9

D104 - Mark 30

D105 - Bourbon East 10 E

D106 - Mayfield 32

D107 - Mt Victory 33

D108 - Ferguson 8

D109 - Colo 35

D110 - Gilliland 40

D111 - Som 5c Mall

D113 - Som 5e Grand Central

D115 - Som 6 South End

E104 - East Burnside County 36e

E112 - Sloans Valley 39

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
85, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
85, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
85, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 123, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 85, effective January 20, 2022.

5.286.
Eighty-sixth Representative District.

The Eighty-sixth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Knox KY

County: Laurel KY (part)

A102 - Campground

A105 - Stansberry

A108 - Mchargue

B102 - Lily

B103 - Felts

B106 - Spring Cut

C101 - Blackwater

C103 - Lake

F107 - South Laurel

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
86, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
86, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
86, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 124, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 86, effective January 20, 2022.

5.287.
Eighty-seventh Representative District.

The Eighty-seventh Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Bell KY

County: Harlan KY (part)

A101 - Harlan

B102 - Ages

B103 - Verda

B104 - North Evarts

B105 - S Evarts

B106 - Brittains Creek

B107 - Shields

B109 - Klondyke

C104 - Cumb Black Motor East

C106 - Blair

C107 - Cumberland New York

C109 - Benham

C111 - Lynch

D101 - Elcomb

D103 - Sunshine

D104 - Grays Knob

D106 - Cawood/Hiram

D108 - Smith

D109 - Cranks

E105 - Wallins-City Hall

E106 - Wallins-School

E107 - Coldiron

E108 - Pathfork

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
87, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
87, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
87, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 125, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 87, effective January 20, 2022.

5.288.
Eighty-eighth Representative District.

The Eighty-eighth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Fayette KY (part)

A104 - Bell School House

A175 - Horse Park

A187 - Town Branch

A189 - Westmorland

A203 - Enterprise

C114 - Autumn Ridge

C125 - Helm

C154 - Man O War

C163 - Greenbrier

C180 - Broadmoor

C185 - N Elkhorn

C192 - Chetford

C193 - Sheffield Place

C194 - Chestnut Hill

C200 - Deer Crossing

C201 - Telluride

C209 - Shaker Run

C210 - Mint Hill

C217 - Denali

C218 - Levi Todd

C223 - Wilkes Run

C224 - Bay Springs Park

C227 - Fortune Hill

C228 - Many Oaks Park

C232 - Turtle Creek

C235 - Red Stone

C236 - Passage Mound

C237 - Orchard Grass

C239 - Needlerush

County: Scott KY (part)

A114 - Falls Creek

A116 - Pavilion

C118 - East Cane Run

D115 - Newtown

D119 - Rocky Creek

D121 - Leesburg

D123 - Elkhorn Green

E126 - Old Mill

E128 - Stables

G134 - Lemons Mill

G138 - Old Depot

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
88, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
88, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
88, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 126, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 88, effective January 20, 2022.

5.289.
Eighty-ninth Representative District.

The Eighty-ninth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jackson KY

County: Laurel KY (part)

C108 - Mcwhorter

D102 - East Bernstadt #2

D103 - Viva

D104 - Oakley

D105 - Cross Roads

D106 - Pittsburg

County: Lee KY

County: Madison KY (part)

A109 - Bobtown Redlick

C105 - Waco

C106 - Brassfield Bearwallow

C107 - Moberly

C108 - Kavanaugh

C109 - East Richmond

County: Wolfe KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
89, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
89, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
89, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 127, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 89, effective January 20, 2022.

5.290.
Ninetieth Representative District.

The Ninetieth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Clay KY

County: Laurel KY (part)

A101 - Sublimity

A103 - London #3

A104 - Rough Creek

A107 - London East

B101 - Fariston

B104 - Rough Creek #2

B105 - Fariston #2

C102 - Bush

C104 - London #1

C105 - Maplesville

C106 - Johnson

C110 - London #2

County: Leslie KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
90, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
90, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
90, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 128, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 90, effective January 20, 2022.

5.291.
Ninety-first Representative District.

The Ninety-first Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Estill KY

County: Madison KY (part)

B101 - Saratoga-Arlington-Roseda

C103 - Mccreary

C104 - College Hill

C110 - Dillingham

C112 - Courthouse-Central

C113 - Watertower

C114 - City Hall-Telford

D109 - Francis

County: Powell KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
91, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
91, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
91, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 129, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 91, effective January 20, 2022.

5.292.
Ninety-second Representative District.

The Ninety-second Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Knott KY

County: Magoffin KY

County: Pike KY (part)

A107 - By Pass

B101 - Caney

B102 - Yeager

B103 - Old Shelby

B104 - Long Fork

B106 - Elwood

B107 - Island Creek

C105 - Raccoon

C106 - Rasnick

C111 - Burning Fork

D101 - Millard

D102 - Greasy Creek

D103 - Upper Chloe

D104 - Marrowbone

D105 - Rockhouse

D106 - New Shelby

D107 - Garden Village

D108 - Henry Clay

D110 - York

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
92, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
92, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
92, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 130, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 92, effective January 20, 2022.

5.293.
Ninety-third Representative District.

The Ninety-third Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Fayette KY (part)

B103 - Sayre Village

B104 - Brigadoon

B106 - Wildwood

B110 - Fairway

B111 - Gainesway

B127 - Merrick

B140 - Southeastern Hills

B143 - Tates Creek

B146 - Kenlock

B155 - Ascot

B164 - Blueberry Hills

B170 - Baffin Bay

B174 - Whispering Hills

B181 - Taborlake

B195 - Walden Grove

B196 - Springhouse

B198 - Bridgemont

B206 - Rolling Creek

B207 - Fox Harbour

B217 - Cobblestone Knoll

B231 - Spencer Park

B232 - River Oak

C152 - Hartland

C160 - Walnut Hill

C161 - Tatesbrook

C162 - Niagara

C164 - East Hills

C173 - Buckhorn

C174 - Century Hills

C175 - East Lake

C176 - Squire Oak

C177 - Summerhill

C178 - Pleasant Grove

C183 - Millcreek

C184 - Mt Foraker

C186 - Old Farm

C188 - Stephen Foster

C197 - Mooreland

C199 - Woodfield

C208 - Rothbury

C216 - Heartwood

C220 - Park Place

C229 - Raven Run

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
93, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
93, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
93, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 131, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 93, effective January 20, 2022.

5.294.
Ninety-fourth Representative District.

The Ninety-fourth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Harlan KY (part)

A108 - Baxter

A110 - Putney

A111 - Pine Mountain

A112 - Bledsoe

C101 - Totz

C102 - Green Morris

C103 - Cumberland City Hall

E102 - Loyall

E104 - Fresh Meadows

County: Letcher KY

County: Pike KY (part)

B105 - Dorton

C101 - Mouthcard

C102 - Upper Elkhorn

C103 - Elkhorn City Hall

C104 - Belcher

C107 - Lick Creek

C109 - Feds Creek

C110 - Looney

D109 - Hellier

D111 - Ashcamp

E101 - Phelps

E102 - Blackberry

E104 - Freeburn

E105 - Majestic

E106 - Wolford

E109 - Mccarr

F101 - Belfry

F103 - Dr. J. E. Johnson

F105 - Runyon

F108 - Old Pond

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
94, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
94, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
94, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 132, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 94, effective January 20, 2022.

5.295.
Ninety-fifth Representative District.

The Ninety-fifth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Floyd KY

County: Pike KY (part)

A101 - Bessie Riddle Arnold

A102 - Hurricane

A103 - Pikeville High School

A104 - Lower Pike

A105 - Myers Towers

A106 - Coal Run

A108 - Mullins School

C112 - Stone Coal

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
95, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
95, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
95, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 133, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 95, effective January 20, 2022.

5.296.
Ninety-sixth Representative District.

The Ninety-sixth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Boyd KY (part)

A109 - East Fork

A119 - Fannin 2

A121 - Cannonsburg

A122 - Marsh Run

C102 - Princess

C110 - Pyramid

C111 - Willow

C114 - Meads 1

C117 - Meads 2

County: Carter KY

County: Lewis KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
96, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
96, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
96, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 134, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 96, effective January 20, 2022.

5.297.
Ninety-seventh Representative District.

The Ninety-seventh Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Johnson KY

County: Martin KY

County: Pike KY (part)

A109 - Brushy

A110 - Lower Johns Creek

C108 - Grapevine

E103 - Deskins

E107 - Meta

E108 - Joes Creek

F102 - Lower Big Creek

F104 - Bevins School

F106 - Turkey Creek

F107 - Huddy

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
97, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
97, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
97, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 135, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 97, effective January 20, 2022.

5.298.
Ninety-eighth Representative District.

The Ninety-eighth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Boyd KY (part)

B102 - Pollard

B103 - Lewis

B106 - Barber

C104 - Hoods Creek

C105 - Fairview

C106 - Buckley

C107 - Westwood

C108 - Millseat

C112 - Sandy Creek

C116 - Winslow-Ironville

County: Greenup KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
98, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
98, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
98, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 136, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 98, effective January 20, 2022.

5.299.
Ninety-ninth Representative District.

The Ninety-ninth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Elliott KY

County: Morgan KY

County: Rowan KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
99, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
99, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
99, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 137, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 99, effective January 20, 2022.

5.300.
One Hundredth Representative District.

The One Hundredth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Boyd KY (part)

A101 - Catlettsburg

A105 - Rush

A106 - Ashland Oil

A107 - England Hill

A108 - Durbin

A110 - Elmwood-Hill Top

A111 - Gartrell

A113 - Gartin

A114 - Carp

A115 - South Ashland

A116 - Ratcliff

A118 - Fannin 1

B101 - Central

B105 - Debord-Tannery

B107 - Vincent

B108 - Mt Adams

B109 - Prichard

B110 - Forest Hills

B114 - Beech

B115 - Grayson-Springhill

B116 - Avondale

B117 - Hillendale

B118 - Rice # 1

B119 - Rice # 2

B121 - Poage

C103 - Kyova

C109 - Moore

C113 - Green Hill

C115 - Rockdale-Summitt

County: Lawrence KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
100, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
100, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
100, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 138, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 100, effective January 20, 2022.